Maine, session 132, LD361.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to support the Francis Malcolm Science Center in
Easton.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $200,000 $0